pt-PT: Certificações de segurança do tapete de wrestling: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Outro
en: Wrestling mat safety certifications: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Other
bg-BG: Сертификати за безопасност на постелки за борба: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Други
ko: 레슬링 매트 안전 인증: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; 기타
lt-LT: Imtynių kilimėlio saugos sertifikatai: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Kita
tr: Güreş minderi güvenlik sertifikaları: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Diğer
hu: Birkózószőnyeg biztonsági tanúsítványai: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Egyéb
da: Sikkerhedscertificeringer for brydemåtte: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Andet
sk-SK: Certifikácie bezpečnosti zápasníckych podložiek: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Iné
sl-SI: Varnostni certifikati za rokoborske blazine: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Drugo
nb: Sikkerhetssertifiseringer for brytematter: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Annet
fi: Painimaton turvallisuussertifikaatit: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Muu
pt-BR: Tatame de luta certificações de segurança: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Outros
pl: Certyfikaty bezpieczeństwa maty zapaśniczej: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Inne
fr: Certifications de sécurité du tapis de lutte: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Autre
th: ใบรับรองความปลอดภัยสำหรับเสื่อมวยปล้ำ: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; อื่นๆ
es: Certificaciones de seguridad para colchonetas de lucha libre: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Otro
ru: Сертификации борцовского мата: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Другое
zh-CN: 摔跤垫安全认证: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; 其他
zh-TW: 摔角墊安全認證: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; 其他
ro-RO: Certificări de siguranță ale saltelei de lupte: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Altele
nl: Certificeringen voor de veiligheid van worstelmatten: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Overig
hr-HR: Sigurnosni certifikati za hrvačke prostirke: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Ostalo
ja: レスリングマットの安全認証: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; その他
cs: Bezpečnostní certifikace zápasnické žíněnky: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Jiné
sv: Säkerhetscertifieringar för brottningsmattor: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Övrigt
el: Πιστοποιήσεις ασφάλειας για τάπητα πάλης: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Άλλο
de: Sicherheitszertifizierungen für Ringermatten: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Sonstige
it: Certificazioni di sicurezza per i tappeti da wrestling: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Altro
vi: Chứng nhận an toàn thảm đấu vật: ASTM F1081; ASTM F355; CPSIA; EN 12503; NCAA; NFHS; Khác